Hawaii statutes.
RETURNS
AND PAYMENTS

§237-30 Monthly, quarterly, or semiannual
return, computation of tax, payment. (a) The taxes levied hereunder shall
be payable in monthly installments on or before the twentieth day of the
calendar month following the month in which they accrue. The taxpayer, on or
before the twentieth day of the calendar month following the month in which the
taxes accrue, shall make out and sign a return of the installment of tax for
which the taxpayer is liable for the preceding month and transmit the same,
together with a remittance, in the form required by section 237-31, for the
amount of the tax, to the office of the department of taxation in the
appropriate district hereinafter designated.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the
director of taxation, for good cause, may permit a taxpayer to file the
taxpayer's return required under this section and make payments thereon:

(1) On a quarterly basis during the calendar or
fiscal year, the return and payment to be made on or before the twentieth day
of the calendar month after the close of each quarter, to wit: for calendar
year taxpayers, on or before April 20, July 20, October 20, and January 20 or,
for fiscal year taxpayers, on or before the twentieth day of the fourth month,
seventh month, and tenth month following the beginning of the fiscal year and
on or before the twentieth day of the month following the close of the fiscal
year; provided that the director is satisfied that the grant of the permit will
not unduly jeopardize the collection of the taxes due thereon and the
taxpayer's total tax liability for the calendar or fiscal year under this
chapter will not exceed $4,000; or

(2) On a semiannual basis during the calendar or
fiscal year, the return and payment to be made on or before the twentieth day
of the calendar month after the close of each six-month period, to wit: for
calendar year taxpayers, on July 20 and January 20 or, for fiscal year
taxpayers, on or before the twentieth day of the seventh month following the
beginning of the fiscal year and on or before the last day of the month
following the close of the fiscal year; provided that the director is satisfied
that the grant of the permit will not unduly jeopardize the collection of the
taxes due thereon and the taxpayer's total tax liability for the calendar or
fiscal year under this chapter will not exceed $2,000.

The director, for good cause, may permit a
taxpayer to make monthly payments based on the taxpayer's estimated quarterly
or semiannual liability, provided the taxpayer files a reconciliation return at
the end of each quarter or at the end of each six-month period during the
calendar or fiscal year, as provided in this section.

(c) If a taxpayer filing the taxpayer's return
on a quarterly or semiannual basis, as provided in this section, becomes
delinquent in either the filing of the taxpayer's return or the payment of the
taxes due thereon, or if the liability of a taxpayer, who possesses a permit to
file the taxpayer's return and to make payments on a semiannual basis exceeds
$2,000 in general excise taxes during the calendar year or exceeds $4,000 in
general excise taxes during the calendar year if making payments on a quarterly
basis, or if the director determines that any such quarterly or semiannual
filing of return would unduly jeopardize the proper administration of this
chapter, including the assessment or collection of the general excise tax, the
director may, at any time, revoke a taxpayer's permit, in which case the
taxpayer will then be required to file the taxpayer's return and make payments
thereon as herein provided in subsection (a).

(d) The director may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

(e) Section 232-2 does not apply to a monthly
return. [L 1935, c 141, §5; am L 1941, c 265, §3; RL 1945, §5461; am L 1945, c
253, §5; am L 1953, c 161, §5; RL 1955, §117-25; am L 1957, c 34, §9; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §16; am L 1964, c 23, §2; am L 1965, c 177, §1; am L 1967, c 26,
§1 and c 37, §1; HRS §237-30; am L 1981, c 139, §1; am L 1985, c 130, §1; gen
ch 1985; am L 1993, c 39, §1; am L Sp 2001 3d, c 8, §3; am L 2009, c 196, §4]

Note

The 2009 amendment applies to returns and payments due after
May 31, 2009. L 2009, c 196, §8.

Cross References

Rules, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next